Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.01.030

Charter code city.

A charter code city is one having at least ten thousand inhabitants at the time of its organization or reorganization which has either initially incorporated as a charter code city and has adopted a charter under the procedure prescribed in this title; or which, as an incorporated municipality, has elected to be classified as a charter code city and to be governed according to the provisions of this title and of its adopted charter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.01.030.]